apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
          <l>ho</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeho</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neho</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nás</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vás</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mne</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebe</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ňom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nej</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ňom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nás</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vás</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mnou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ním</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ňou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ním</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nami</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vami</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nimi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nimi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="čít/ať__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ať</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aš</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ate</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajú</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alo</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ali</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aj</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajme</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajte</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="čítať"><par n="ne+"/><i>čít</i><par n="čít/ať__vblex"/></e>
